Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-1362
Sections; administration.

The provisions of sections 54-1348 to 54-1366 shall be administered by the bureau with whatever assistance the bureau may request of and receive from the United States Department of Agriculture, Agricultural Research Service, Animal and Plant Health Inspection Service on a cooperative basis.

Laws 1973, LB 182, § 15.